Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 2

Family Support

33-5-201. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Council” means the state family support council appointed under § 33-5-208;

“Family” means a unit that consists of either a person with a severe or developmental disability and the parent, relative, or other care giver who resides in the same household or a person with a severe or developmental disability who lives alone without such support;

“Family support” means goods and services needed by families to care for their family members with a severe or developmental disability and to enjoy a quality of life comparable to other community members;

“Family support program” means a coordinated system of family support services administered by the department directly or through contracts;

“Severe disability” means a disability that is functionally similar to a developmental disability but occurred after the person was twenty-two (22) years of age; and

“State family support council” means the council established by the department to carry out the responsibilities specified in this part.

Acts 1992, ch. 981, § 3; 1994, ch. 683, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-5-402; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 5, §§ 33-5-101, 33-5-105, 33-5-201, 33-5-301 — 33-5-303, 33-5-305 — 33-5-310, 33-5-401 — 33-5-412 (Acts 1971, ch. 289, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 763, § 4; 1976, ch. 764, § 3; 1978, ch. 527, § 3; 1978, ch. 667, § 2; 1980, ch. 822, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, §§ 5, 6, 10; 1982, ch. 862, § 2; 1983, ch. 323, § 10; T.C.A., §§ 33-313, 33-501, 33-505 — 33-507, 33-510, 33-515, 33-516, 33-523, 33-524, 33-1601; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 6, 8-11; 1988, ch. 828, § 2; 1989, ch. 504, § 1; 1992, ch. 981, §§ 2-13, 15; 1992, ch. 991, § 14; 1993, ch. 283, § 1; 1994, ch. 683, § 1; 1995, ch. 468, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-5-102 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A. § 33-502), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; § 33-5-103 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A. § 33-503), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; § 33-5-104 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 763, § 3; 1978, ch. 527, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-504), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; and § 33-5-304 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1978, ch. 527, § 2; 1978, ch. 667, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-508), which was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

33-5-202. State policy — Principles for developing programs.

The policy of the state is that persons with severe or developmental disabilities and their families be afforded supports that emphasize community living and enable them to enjoy typical lifestyles.

Programs to support families shall be based on the following principles:

Families and individuals with severe or developmental disabilities are best able to determine their own needs and should be empowered to make decisions concerning necessary, desirable, and appropriate services and supports;

Families should receive the support necessary to care for their relatives at home;

Family support is needed throughout the life span of the person who has a severe or developmental disability;

Family support services should be sensitive to the unique needs, strengths, and values of the person and the family, and should be responsive to the needs of the entire family;

Family support should build on existing social networks and natural sources of support in communities;

Family support services should be provided in a manner that develops comprehensive, responsive, and flexible support to families as their needs evolve over time;

Family support services should be provided equitably across the state and be coordinated across the numerous agencies likely to provide resources and services and support to families; and

Family, individual, and community-based services and supports should be based on sharing ordinary places, developing meaningful relationships, learning things that are useful, and making choices, as well as increasing the status and enhancing the reputation of persons served.

Acts 1992, ch. 981, § 2; T.C.A., § 33-5-401; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-5-203. Primary focus.

The primary focus of the family support program is supporting:

Families with children with severe or developmental disabilities, school age and younger;

Adults with severe or developmental disabilities who choose to live with their families; and

Adults with severe or developmental disabilities who are residing in the community in an unsupported setting not a state or federally funded program.

Acts 1992, ch. 981, § 5; T.C.A., § 33-5-404; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-5-204. Duties of contracted agency.

The contracted agency shall be responsible for assisting each family for whom services and support will be provided in assessing each family's needs and shall prepare a written plan with the person and family. The needs and preferences of the family and individual will be the basis for determining what goods and services will be made available within the resources available.

Acts 1992, ch. 981, § 6; T.C.A., § 33-5-405; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-5-205. Scope of family support services.

The family support services included in this program include, but are not limited to, family support services coordination, information, referral, advocacy, educational materials, emergency and outreach services, and other individual and family-centered assistance services, such as:

Respite care;

Personal assistance services;

Child care;

Homemaker services;

Minor home modifications and vehicular modifications;

Specialized equipment and maintenance and repair;

Specialized nutrition and clothing and supplies;

Transportation services;

Health-related costs not otherwise covered;

Licensed nursing and nurses aid services; and

Family counseling, training and support groups.

Acts 1992, ch. 981, § 7; T.C.A., § 33-5-406; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-5-206. Coordination of services.

As a part of the family support program, the contracted agency shall provide service coordination for each family that includes information, coordination, and other assistance as needed by the family.

Acts 1992, ch. 981, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-5-407; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-5-207. Families of adults with disabilities — Services and resources.

The family support program shall assist families of adults with a severe or developmental disabilities in planning and obtaining community living arrangements, employment services, and other resources needed to achieve, to the greatest extent possible, independence, productivity, and integration into the community.

Acts 1992, ch. 981, § 9; T.C.A., § 33-5-408; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-5-208. State family support council.

The commissioner shall appoint a state family support council comprised of fifteen (15) members, of whom at least a majority shall be persons with severe or developmental disabilities or their parents or primary care givers. The council shall have one (1) representative from each development district of the state, one (1) representative of the council on developmental disabilities, one (1) representative of the Tennessee disability coalition, one (1) representative of the Tennessee community organizations, and one (1) representative of a center for independent living. The commissioner shall appoint two (2) at-large members for the department.

Acts 1992, ch. 981, § 10; T.C.A., § 33-5-409; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 27; 2005, ch. 27, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The state family support council, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-243.

33-5-209. Department to participate with council — Policies and procedures.

The department shall adopt policies and procedures regarding the development of appropriations requested for family support.

Unless the commissioner determines an exigent circumstance exists, the department shall seek input from the state family support council prior to adopting policies and procedures regarding:

Program specifications:

Criteria for program services;

Methodology for allocating resources to families within the funds available;

Eligibility determination and admissions; and

Limits on benefits;

Coordination of the family support program and the use of its funds equitably throughout the state, with other publicly funded programs, including medicaid;

Resolution of grievances filed by families pertaining to actions of the family support program, and an appeals process;

Quality assurance; and

Annual evaluation of services, including consumer satisfaction.

Acts 1992, ch. 981, § 11; T.C.A., § 33-5-410; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2015, ch. 301, § 1.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment designated the former first sentence and (1) as (a) and, in (a), deleted “participate with the state family support council and shall” preceding “adopt policies”; added (b); designated the language “Program specifications:” as (b)(1) and redesignated former (3)-(6) as (2)-(5).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 301, § 3. April 24, 2015.

33-5-210. Meetings — Duties — Expenses.

The state family support council shall meet at least quarterly. The council shall participate in the development of program policies and procedures, and perform other duties as are necessary for statewide implementation of the family support program. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in conformity with the comprehensive state travel regulations as promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Any council member who misses more than fifty percent (50%) of the scheduled meetings in a calendar year shall be removed as a member of the council.

The chair of the council shall promptly notify, or cause to be notified, the appointing authority of any member who fails to satisfy the attendance requirement as prescribed in subdivision (b)(1).

Acts 1992, ch. 981, § 12; T.C.A., § 33-5-411; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2016, ch. 615, § 3.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 615, § 4. March 22, 2016.

33-5-211. Administration of program — Funding.

The department shall administer the family support services program and shall establish annual benefit levels per family served. Implementation of this part and the program and annual benefit levels, or any portion of the program or benefits levels, are contingent upon annual line item appropriation of sufficient funding for the programs and benefits.

Acts 1992, ch. 981, §§ 13, 15; T.C.A., § 33-5-412; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-5-212. Provision of information gathered through family support program to DIDD.

In accordance with policies and procedures developed and adopted by the state family support council and the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities (DIDD), information gathered through the family support program on persons with a developmental disability, other than an intellectual disability, for whom services are needed shall be provided to DIDD on at least a quarterly basis.

Acts 2006, ch. 604, § 1; 2009, ch. 477, § 1; 2010, ch. 734, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, § 42; 2015, ch. 301, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 604, § 2 provided that the provisions of the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted “comprehensive home and community-based” preceding “services are needed” and added “at least” preceding “a quarterly basis” at the end of the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 301, § 3. April 24, 2015.